Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.058

Major lines—School of medicine—Forestry.

The board of regents of Washington State University may offer and teach medicine as a major line, and is authorized to establish, operate, and maintain a school of medicine at the university. The board of regents of Washington State University may offer and teach forestry as a major line.

[ 2015 c 6 s 1.]